Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB472.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1505(g) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and subsection (e) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 102 OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:§ 102. DEFINITIONS.SUBJECT TO ADDITIONAL DEFINITIONS CONTAINED IN SUBSEQUENT PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE WHICH ARE APPLICABLE TO SPECIFIC PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS TITLE SHALL HAVE, UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 INDICATES OTHERWISE, THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION:* * *"MINOR EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS." AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE WHO MEETS THE DEFINITION OF "HOMELESS CHILDREN AND YOUTHS" UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 11434A (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS).* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 1505(G) OF TITLE 75 IS AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (E) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:§ 1505. Learners' permits.* * *(e) Authorization to test for driver's license and junior driver's license.--A person with a learner's permit is authorized to take the examination for a regular or junior driver's license for the class of vehicle for which a permit is held. Before a person under the age of 18 years may take the examination for a junior driver's license, including a Class M license to operate a motorcycle, the minor must:* * *(2.1) Present the certification form required by paragraph (2) signed by a teacher, social worker or children and youth caseworker if that person meets the definition of "homeless children and youths" under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 119 (relating to homeless assistance).(2.1) IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS A MINOR EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS, THE INDIVIDUAL MAY PRESENT THE CERTIFICATION FORM REQUIRED BY PARAGRAPH (2) SIGNED BY A TEACHER, SOCIAL WORKER OR CHILDREN AND YOUTH CASEWORKER OF THE MINOR EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS.* * *(g) Liability.--Submission of a certification under 20250HB0472PN1023 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (e)(2) shall not subject [the parent, guardian, person in loco parentis or spouse of a married minor to any liability based upon the certification.] any of the following to any liability based on the certification:(1) the parent, guardian, person in loco parentis or spouse of a married minor; or(2) teacher, social worker or children and youth caseworker of any minor who meets the definition of "homeless children and youths" under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 119 (relating to homeless assistance). A MINOR EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS. * * *Section 2 3. Section 1506 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1506. Application for driver's license or learner's permit.* * *(c) Homeless children and youth.--A person who meets the definition of "homeless children and youths" under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 119 (relating to homeless assistance) MINOR EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS shall be permitted to use a temporary address, including the address of a school, foster home or shelter, for any application under this section.Section 3 4. Section 1507(a) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 1507. Application for driver's license or learner's permit by minor.(a) Signature of parent or guardian.--The application of any person under the age of 18 years for a learner's permit or driver's license shall also be signed by the father, mother, guardian or person in loco parentis which signature shall be verified before a person authorized to administer oaths or before an authorized department employee. In addition to the 20250HB0472PN1023 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of this subsection, the signature of a teacher, social worker or children and youth caseworker shall be accepted for a person who meets the definition of "homeless children and youths" under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 119 (relating to homeless assistance). OF A MINOR EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS SHALL BE ACCEPTED.* * *Section 4 5. Sections 1510 and 1951 of Title 75 are amended by adding subsections to read:§ 1510. Issuance and content of driver's license.* * *(k) Waiver of fee.--A person who meets the definition of "homeless children and youths" under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 119 (relating to homeless assistance) MINOR EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS shall not be required to pay a fee to obtain a AN INITIAL driver's license or AN INITIAL identification card. § 1951. Driver's license and learner's permit.* * *(e) Waiver of fee.--A person who meets the definition of "homeless children and youths" under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 119 (relating to homeless assistance) MINOR EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS shall not be required to pay a fee to obtain a AN INITIAL driver's license or AN INITIAL identification card. Section 5 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days 19 MONTHS.20250HB0472PN1023 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425